Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2026
2-1095

Nursery stock distributors; nursery stock; certification
inspection; application; distribution; restrictions; treatment or destruction of
stock; department; powers.

(1) All nursery stock distributors that distribute any nursery stock that they
grow shall apply for a certification inspection of the Nebraska-grown nursery
stock as provided in this section. The nursery stock distributor shall receive
such certification inspection of the Nebraska-grown nursery stock as part of the
nursery stock distributor license described in section 2-1091.01.

(2)(a) Applications for certification inspection of Nebraska-grown nursery
stock that are due on January 1 pursuant to section 2-1091.01 and are not
received prior to February 1 and initial applications not received prior to
beginning of distribution shall be considered delinquent. Such applications
shall be accompanied with the inspection fee that is set forth in section
2-1091.02.

(b) Inspection time shall be determined based on any portion of a whole hour
and shall include the driving time to and from the location of the inspection in
addition to the time spent conducting the inspection, and the mileage charge
shall be for the purpose of inspection.

(3) Each nursery stock distributor shall post signs delineating sections of
all growing areas. A section shall be not larger than five acres.

(4) All growing areas within the state shall be inspected by the department at
least once per year for certification and compliance with the Plant Protection
and Plant Pest Act.

(5) Following the certification inspection of Nebraska-grown nursery stock,
the department shall provide a copy of the plant inspection report to the
nursery stock distributor specifying any area of the nursery from which nursery
stock cannot be distributed or any plants which may not be distributed as
nursery stock. When deemed necessary to maintain compliance with the purposes of
the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Act, the department shall require the
nursery stock distributor to withdraw from distribution any variety or amount of
nursery stock. A reinspection may be conducted by the department at the nursery
stock distributor's request and cost. The department may also reinspect to
determine compliance with the act. To determine the cost of any reinspection,
the department shall use fees as outlined in subsection (2) of this section. The
nursery stock distributor shall comply with the recommendations of the
department as to the treatment or destruction of nursery stock.

(6) The department may require the treatment or destruction of any nursery
stock that is infested or infected with plant pests, nonviable, damaged, or
desiccated to the point of not being reasonably capable of growth.

(7) Any nursery stock on which a withdrawal-from-distribution order has been
issued shall be released for distribution only by authorized department
employees or after written permission has been obtained from the department.
Each nursery stock distributor shall promptly report to the department, in
writing, the amount and type of plants treated or destroyed under requirements
on withdrawal-from-distribution orders. The department may withhold a license or
certification of Nebraska-grown nursery stock until conditions have been met by
the nursery stock distributor as specified in the plant inspection report or any
other order issued by the department. A certification of Nebraska-grown stock
may be issued covering portions of the nursery which are not infested or
infected if the nursery stock distributor agrees to treat, destroy, or remove as
specified by the department those plants found to be infested or
infected.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 24;

Laws 1993, LB 406, § 15;

Laws 2013, LB68, § 10;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 4.

March 17, 2026